California statutes. Public Resources Code
(3) If the Attorney General establishes in the name of the people of the State of California that any money, property, or benefit was obtained by a contractor as a result of violating this section, the court may, in addition to any other remedy, order the disgorgement of the
 unlawfully obtained money, property, or benefit in the interest of justice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 381, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Inapplicability of Chapter [42485. - 42486.]

42485.

Except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 42486, CalRecycle and DTSC shall not implement this chapter if either of the following occur:

(a) A federal law, or a combination of federal laws, takes effect and does all of the following:

(1) Establishes a program for the collection, recycling, and proper disposal of covered electronic waste that is applicable to all covered electronic devices sold in the United States.

(2) Provides revenues to the state to support the collection, recycling, and proper disposal of covered electronic waste, in an amount
 that is equal to, or greater than, the revenues that would be generated by the fee imposed under Section 42464.

(3) Requires covered electronic device manufacturers, retailers, handlers, processors, and recyclers to dispose of those devices in a manner that is in compliance with all applicable federal, state, and local laws, and prohibits the devices from being exported for disposal in a manner that poses a significant risk to the public health or the environment.

(b) A trial court issues a judgment, which is not appealed, or an
 appellate court issues an order affirming a judgment of a trial court, holding that out-of-state manufacturers or retailers, or both, may not be required to collect the fee authorized by this chapter. The out-of-state manufacturers or retailers, or both, shall continue to collect the fee during the appellate process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 370, Sec. 31.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Note: Termination provisions affect Chapter 8.5, commencing with Section 42460.)
-------------------------------------------

42486.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the provisions of this chapter shall become inoperative on the date that either of the events described in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 42485 occurs, and if both occur, the earlier date.

(b) On the date specified in subdivision (a), the
 provisions of this chapter shall remain operative only for the collection of fees, the liability for which accrued prior to that date, making refunds, effecting credits, the disposition of moneys collected, and commencing an action or proceeding pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 863, Sec. 22.   Effective September 29, 2004.   Note: Termination provisions affect Chapter 8.5, commencing with Section 42460.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.6. Right to Repair Act [42488. - 42488.3.]

42488.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Right to Repair Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 704, Sec. 1.   (SB 244)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

42488.1.

It is the intent of the Legislature to provide a fair marketplace for the repair of electronic and appliance products and to prohibit intentional barriers and limitations to third-party repair.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 704, Sec. 1.   (SB 244)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

42488.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, every manufacturer of an electronic or appliance product with a wholesale price to the retailer, or to others outside of direct retail sale, of not less than fifty dollars ($50) and not more than ninety-nine dollars and ninety-nine cents ($99.99), shall make available to owners of the product, service and repair facilities, and service dealers, sufficient documentation and functional parts and tools, inclusive of any updates, on fair and reasonable terms, to effect the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of a product for at least three years after the last date a product model or type was manufactured, regardless of whether the three-year period exceeds the warranty period for the product.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, every manufacturer of an electronic or appliance product with a wholesale price to the retailer, or to others outside of direct retail sale, of one hundred dollars ($100) or more, shall make available to owners of the product, service and repair facilities, and service dealers sufficient documentation and functional parts and tools, inclusive of any updates, on fair and reasonable terms, to effect the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of a product for at least seven years after the last date a product model or type was manufactured, regardless of whether the seven-year period exceeds the warranty period for the product.

(c) Except as necessary to comply with this section, this section does not require a manufacturer to
 divulge a trade secret or license any intellectual property, including copyrights or patents.

(d) This section does not require the distribution of a product’s source code.

(e) A service and repair facility or service dealer that is not an authorized repair provider of a manufacturer shall provide a written notice to any customer seeking repair of an electronic or appliance product before the repair facility or service dealer repairs the product that informs the customer that it is not an authorized repair provider for the product, and shall disclose if it uses any used replacement parts or replacement parts provided by a supplier other than the manufacturer of the product.

(f) Nothing in
 this section shall be construed to require a manufacturer to make available special documentation, tools, and parts that would disable or override antitheft security measures set by the owner of the product without the owner’s authorization.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a manufacturer to sell service parts if the service parts are no longer provided by the manufacturer or made available to an authorized repair provider.

(h) (1) No manufacturer or authorized repair provider shall be liable for any damage or injury caused to any electronic or appliance product, person, or property that occurs as a result of repair, diagnosis, maintenance, or modification performed by a service dealer or owner, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Any indirect, incidental, special, or consequential damages.

(B) Any loss of data, privacy, or profits.

(C) Any inability to use, or reduced functionality of, the electronic or appliance product.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to a design defect or manufacturing flaw that existed prior to, or independent of, the repair, diagnosis, maintenance, or modification performed pursuant to this section.

(i) If a manufacturer is considered an authorized repair provider under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (j), this section shall not require the manufacturer to make available either of the following:

(1) Documentation or tools that the manufacturer itself uses only to perform, at no cost, diagnostic services virtually through telephone, internet, chat, email, or other similar means that do not involve the manufacturer physically handling the customer’s electronic or appliance product, unless the manufacturer also makes the documentation or tools available to an individual or business that is unaffiliated with the manufacturer.

(2) Documentation or tools used exclusively for repairs completed by machines that operate on several electronic or appliance products simultaneously, if the manufacturer makes
 available to owners of the product, service and repair facilities, and service dealers sufficient alternative documentation and tools to effect the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of the electronic or appliance product.

(j) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) (A) “Authorized repair provider” means an individual or business that is unaffiliated with a manufacturer
 and that has an arrangement with the manufacturer, for a definite or indefinite period, under which the manufacturer grants to the individual or business a license to use a trade name, service mark, or other proprietary identifier to offer diagnostic, maintenance, or repair services for electronic or appliance products under the name of the manufacturer or an arrangement with the manufacturer to offer diagnostic, maintenance, or repair services for electronic or appliance products on behalf of the manufacturer.

(B) A manufacturer that offers diagnostic, maintenance, or repair services for the manufacturer’s
 electronic or appliance products is considered an authorized repair provider with respect to the electronic or appliance products if the manufacturer does not have an arrangement described in subparagraph (A) with an unaffiliated individual or business.

(2) “Documentation” means any electronic or appliance product manual, diagram, reporting output, service code description, schematic, or similar information that is provided by a manufacturer to an authorized repair provider, or that is for use by the manufacturer if the manufacturer does not have any authorized repair providers, for purposes of effecting the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of
 the electronic or appliance product.

(3) (A) “Electronic or appliance product” or “product” means a product, manufactured for the first time, and first sold or used in California, on or after July 1, 2021, described in subdivision (h), (i), (j), or (k) of Section 9801 of the Business and Professions Code for which the manufacturer makes available tools, parts, and documentation to authorized repair providers, and includes products described in those subdivisions that are sold to schools, businesses, local governments, or in other methods outside of direct retail sale.

(B) “Electronic or appliance product” or “product” does not include any of the following:

(i) Equipment or repair parts as defined in Chapter
 28 (commencing with Section 22900) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code.

(ii) A product or component of an “alarm system” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 7590.1 of the Business and Professions
 Code, including a fire protection system, as defined in the California Fire Code.

(iii) A video game console.

(4) “Fair and reasonable terms” means each of the following, as applicable:

(A) At costs and terms that
 are equivalent to the most favorable costs and terms under which the manufacturer offers the part, tool, or documentation to an authorized repair provider, accounting for any discount, rebate, convenient and timely means of delivery, means of enabling fully restored and updated functionality, rights of use, or other incentive or preference the manufacturer offers to an authorized repair provider.

(B) For documentation, including any relevant updates, that the documentation is made available at no charge, except that, when the documentation is requested in physical printed form, a charge may be included for the reasonable actual
 costs of preparing and sending the copy.

(C) For tools, that the tools are made available by the manufacturer at no charge and without imposing impediments to access or use of the tools to diagnose, maintain, or repair and enable full functionality of the product, or in a manner that impairs the efficient and cost-effective performance of any such diagnosis, maintenance, or repair, except that, when a tool is requested in physical form, a
 charge may be included for the reasonable, actual costs of preparing and sending the tool.

(D) If a manufacturer does not use an authorized repair provider, “fair and reasonable terms” means at a price that reflects the actual cost to the manufacturer to prepare and deliver the part, tool, or documentation, exclusive of any research and development costs
 incurred.

(5) “Part” means any replacement part or assembly of parts, either new or used, made available by a manufacturer of an electronic or appliance product to an authorized repair provider to facilitate the maintenance or repair of a product sold by the manufacturer.

(6) “Service dealer” has the same meaning as defined in Section 9801 of the Business and Professions Code.

(7) “Tool” means any software program, hardware implement, or other apparatus made available by a manufacturer of an electronic or appliance product to an authorized repair provider for the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of the product, including software or other mechanisms that provision, program,
 pair a part, provide or calibrate functionality, or perform any other function required to repair the product or part back to fully functional condition, including any updates.

(8) “Trade secret” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 3426.1 of the Civil Code, or paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 499c of the Penal Code. 

(9) “Video game console” means a computing device, including its components and peripherals, that is primarily used by consumers for playing video games, such as a console machine, a handheld console device, or another device or system. “Video game console” does not include a general or an all-purpose computer, which includes, but is not limited to, a desktop computer, laptop, tablet, or cell phone. 

(k) This section shall not apply if the manufacturer provides an equivalent or better, readily available replacement electronic or appliance product at no charge to the customer.

(l) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 704, Sec. 1.   (SB 244)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

42488.3.

(a) (1) A city, a county, a city and county, or the state may bring an action in superior court to impose civil liability on a person or entity that knowingly violated this chapter, or reasonably should have known that it violated this chapter, in the amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for the first violation of this chapter, two thousand dollars ($2,000) per day for the second violation, and five thousand dollars ($5,000) per day for the third and subsequent violations.

(2) Any action described in paragraph (1) shall be commenced within three years from the date of the alleged violation.

(b) Any civil penalties collected pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be paid to the office of the city attorney, county counsel, district attorney, or Attorney General, whichever office brought the action. The penalties collected pursuant to this section by the
 Attorney General shall be deposited into the Public Rights Law Enforcement Special Fund.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 704, Sec. 1.   (SB 244)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.7. Cell Phone Recycling Act of 2004 [42490. - 42499.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [42490. - 42490.1.]

42490.

This act shall be known, and may be cited as, the Cell Phone Recycling Act of 2004.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Inoperative September 30, 2027, pursuant to Section 42499.5.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 42499.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42490.1.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The purpose of this chapter is to enact a comprehensive and innovative system for the reuse, recycling, and proper and legal disposal of used cell phones.

(b) It is the further purpose of this chapter to enact a law that establishes a program that is convenient for consumers and the public to return, recycle, and ensure the safe and environmentally sound disposal of used cell phones, and providing a system that does not charge when a cell phone is returned.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the cost associated with the handling, recycling, and disposal of used cell phones be the responsibility of the producers and consumers of cell phones, and not local government or their service providers, state government, or taxpayers.

(d) In order to reduce the likelihood of illegal disposal of hazardous materials, it is the intent of this chapter to ensure that all costs associated with the proper management of used cell phones is internalized by the producers and consumers of cell phones at or before the point of purchase, and not at the point of discard.

(e) Manufacturers and retailers of cell phones and cell phone service providers, in working to achieve the goals and objectives of this chapter, should have the flexibility to partner with each other and with those private and nonprofit business enterprises that currently provide collection and processing services to develop and promote a safe and effective used cell phone recycling system for California.

(f) The producers of cell phones should reduce and, to the extent feasible, ultimately phase out the use of hazardous materials in cell phones.

(g) Cell phones, to the greatest extent feasible, should be designed for extended life, repair, and reuse.

(h) The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the safe, cost free, and convenient collection, reuse, and recycling of 100 percent of the used cell phones discarded or offered for recycling in the state.

(i) In establishing a cost effective system for the recovery, reuse, recycling and proper disposal of used cell phones, it is the intent of the Legislature to encourage manufacturers, retailers and service providers to build on the retailer take-back systems initiated recently by some cell phone service providers.

(j) An estimated 5 percent of obsolete cell phones are currently being recycled through a mechanism, whereby private sector recyclers provide retailers with a postage paid box for mailing returned cell phones to the recycler at no cost to the retailers. In some instances, the scrap value of these used phones is sufficient for the recycler to either pay the retailer or make a financial contribution on behalf of the retailer to a nonprofit charity. It is the intent of the Legislature that this model system be substantially expanded as a result of the enactment of this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Inoperative September 30, 2027, pursuant to Section 42499.5.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 42499.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [42493. - 42493.]

42493.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) “Cell phone” means a wireless telephone device that is designed to send or receive transmissions through a cellular radiotelephone service, as defined in Section 22.99 of Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations. A cell phone includes the rechargeable battery that may be connected to that cell phone. A cell phone does not include a wireless telephone device that is integrated into the electrical architecture of a motor vehicle.

(b) “Consumer” means a purchaser or owner of a cell phone. “Consumer” also includes a business, corporation, limited partnership, nonprofit organization, or governmental entity, but does not include an entity involved in a wholesale transaction between a distributor and retailer.

(c) “Department” means the Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(d) “Retailer” means a person who sells a cell phone in the state to a consumer, including a manufacturer of a cell phone who sells that cell phone directly to a consumer. A sale includes, but is not limited to, transactions conducted through sales outlets, catalogs, or the Internet, or any other similar electronic means, but does not include a sale that is a wholesale transaction with a distributor or retailer.

(e) (1) “Sell” or “sale” means a transfer for consideration of title or of the right to use, by lease or sales contract, including, but not limited to, transactions conducted through sales outlets, catalogs, or the Internet or any other, similar electronic means, but does not include a wholesale transaction with a distributor or a retailer.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision and subdivision (d), “distributor” means a person who sells a cell phone to a retailer.

(f) “Used cell phone” means a cell phone that has been previously used and is made available, by a consumer, for reuse, recycling, or proper disposal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Inoperative September 30, 2027, pursuant to Section 42499.5.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 42499.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Cell Phone Recycling [42494. - 42495.]

42494.

(a) On and after July 1, 2006, every retailer of cell phones sold in this state shall have in place a system for the acceptance and collection of used cell phones for reuse, recycling, or proper disposal.

(b) A system for the acceptance and collection of used cell phones for reuse, recycling, or proper disposal shall, at a minimum, include all of the following elements:

(1) The take-back from the consumer of a used cell phone that the retailer sold or previously sold to the consumer, at no cost to that consumer. The retailer may require proof of purchase.

(2) The take-back of a used cell phone from a consumer who is purchasing a new cell phone from that retailer, at no cost to that consumer.

(3) If the retailer delivers a cell phone directly to a consumer in this state, the system provides the consumer, at the time of delivery, with a mechanism for the return of used cell phones for reuse, recycling, or proper disposal, at no cost to the consumer.

(4) Make information available to consumers about cell phone recycling opportunities provided by the retailer and encourage consumers to utilize those opportunities. This information may include, but is not limited to, one or more of the following:

(A) Signage that is prominently displayed and easily visible to the consumer.

(B) Written materials provided to the consumer at the time of purchase or delivery, or both.

(C) Reference to the cell phone recycling opportunity in retailer advertising or other promotional materials, or both.

(D) Direct communications with the consumer at the time of purchase.

(c) Paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) does not apply to a retailer that only sells prepaid cell phones and does not provide the ability for a consumer to sign a contract for cell phone service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Inoperative September 30, 2027, pursuant to Section 42499.5.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 42499.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42495.

On and after July 1, 2006, it is unlawful to sell a cell phone to a consumer in this state unless the retailer of that cell phone complies with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Inoperative September 30, 2027, pursuant to Section 42499.5.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 42499.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Statewide Recycling Goals [42496.4. - 42496.4.]

42496.4.

On July 1, 2007, and each July 1, thereafter, the department shall post on its Web site an estimated California recycling rate for cell phones, the numerator of which shall be the estimated number of cell phones returned for recycling in California during the previous calendar year, and the denominator of which is the number of cell phones estimated to be sold in this state during the previous calendar year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Inoperative September 30, 2027, pursuant to Section 42499.5.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 42499.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. State Agency Procurement [42498. - 42498.]

42498.

(a) (1) A state agency that purchases or leases cell phones shall require each prospective bidder, to certify that it, and its agents, subsidiaries, partners, joint venturers, and subcontractors for the procurement, have complied with this chapter and any regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, or to demonstrate that this chapter is inapplicable to all lines of business engaged in by the bidder, its agents, subsidiaries, partners, joint venturers, or subcontractors.

(2) The certification requirement set forth in paragraph (1) does not apply to a credit card purchase of goods of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or less. The total amount of exemption authorized herein shall not exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per year for each company from which a state agency is purchasing goods by credit card. It shall be the responsibility of each state agency to monitor the use of this exemption and adhere to these restrictions on these purchases.

(b) Failure to provide certification pursuant to this section shall render the prospective bidder and its agents, subsidiaries, partners, joint venturers, and subcontractors ineligible to bid on the procurement of cell phones.

(c) The bid solicitation documents shall specify that the prospective bidder is required to cooperate fully in providing reasonable access to its records and documents that evidence compliance with this chapter.

(d) Any person awarded a contract by a state agency that is found to be in violation of this section is subject to the following sanctions:

(1) The contract shall be voided by the state agency to which the equipment, materials, or supplies were provided.

(2) The contractor is ineligible to bid on any state contract for a period of three years.

(3) If the Attorney General establishes in the name of the people of the State of California that any money, property, or benefit was obtained by a contractor as a result of violating this section, the court may, in addition to any other remedy, order the disgorgement of the unlawfully obtained money, property, or benefit in the interest of justice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 381, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Inoperative September 30, 2027, pursuant to Section 42499.5.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 42499.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Effect of Act [42499. - 42499.]

42499.

This chapter shall not be construed to affect Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code, any regulation adopted pursuant to that chapter, or any obligation imposed on a person pursuant to that chapter, relating to cell phones or used cell phones.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Inoperative September 30, 2027, pursuant to Section 42499.5.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 42499.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Repeal [42499.5. - 42499.5.]

42499.5.

This chapter shall become inoperative on September 30, 2027, and, as of January 1, 2028, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 3.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Ch. 8.7, commencing with Section 42490.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Technical Assistance Program [42500. - 42540.]



  ARTICLE 1. Enforcement Agency Training and Assistance [42500. - 42501.]

42500.

The board shall provide periodic training to enforcement agencies regarding changes in state or federal regulations, new technologies affecting solid waste landfill operations, and other matters which will enhance the enforcement agencies’ ability to carry out their enforcement responsibilities. In providing that training, the board shall pay particular attention to cities and counties which meet the criteria specified in Section 41782.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1035, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42501.

(a) The board shall provide ongoing technical assistance and guidance to enforcement agencies to assist in their decisionmaking processes. This assistance shall include, but is not limited to, providing all of the following:

(1) Technical studies and reports.

(2) Copies of innovative facility operation plans.

(3) Investigative findings and analyses of new waste management practices and procedures.

(b) In providing that assistance, the board shall pay particular attention to cities and counties which meet the criteria specified in Section 41782.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1035, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Nonyard Wood Waste Disposal Minimization [42510. - 42511.]

42510.

It is the intent of the Legislature that actions taken by the department and cities and counties pursuant to this article serve in the best interests of cities and counties by preserving existing disposal site capacity and providing a source of revenue from the stabilization and expansion of markets for processed wood waste materials. Actions taken pursuant to this article shall be separate from, and not be counted toward, the diversion requirements established pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 41780.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 342, Sec. 7.   (AB 1857)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42511.

The board shall assist cities and counties to divert nonyard wood wastes which cannot otherwise feasibly be reduced, recycled, or composted, for processing and utilization as a fuel resource, provided that the facilities which use the nonyard wood waste as a fuel resource have obtained any necessary permits which allow the use of those materials as a fuel and to the extent the diversion is consistent with the hierarchy set forth in Section 40051.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 717, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Plastic Recycling Assistance [42520. - 42520.]

42520.

The board shall establish a Plastics Recycling Information Clearinghouse. This clearinghouse shall provide information to postconsumer plastics collectors, reprocessors, and recyclers about programs collecting postconsumer plastics, availability of postconsumer plastics, and recent advances in postconsumer plastics recycling technology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1038, Sec. 24.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. City and County Integrated Waste Management Plans [42540. - 42540.]

42540.

The board shall provide technical assistance to counties and cities to assist in development, revision, amendment, and implementation of local city source reduction and recycling elements and countywide integrated waste management plans. Assistance rendered, at the discretion of the board, includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Developing regulations for the implementation of the city source reduction and recycling elements and the countywide integrated waste management plans.

(b) Conducting waste characterization studies on a city, county, district, regional, or statewide basis, or any combination thereof.

(c) Developing annual baseline data for measurement of the effectiveness of local plans in achieving statewide goals.

(d) Conducting studies on issues or problems that impact the ability of local government, the state, or business and industry in achieving individual or collective goals for integrated waste management.

(e) Developing mechanisms to implement market development recommendations recommended by the board.

(f) Providing technical and general information deemed appropriate to assist state and local governments achieve the objectives of integrated waste management elements and plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1096, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.5. Telephone Directory Recycling [42550. - 42558.]



  ARTICLE 1. Telephone Directory Recycling Goals [42550. - 42556.]

42550.

For purposes of this chapter, “telephone directory” means a directory which lists the calling numbers of telephones located in this state of which 1,000 or more copies are distributed to the general public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1066, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42551.

The board shall conduct a study of the feasibility of requiring that all telephone directories issued or sold in this state be made of materials that will allow for the maximum volume of directories to be recycled. The board shall consult with representatives of telephone directory publishers, including the Yellow Pages Publishers Association, as well as representatives of recycling operators. The board shall make use of public hearings and workshops as a means of providing an opportunity for public comment. The board may create an advisory board consisting of members representing telephone directory publishers, recycling operators, and other interested parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1066, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42553.

Article 2 (commencing with Section 42557) shall become operative only if the report required in former Section 42552, as added by Chapter 1066 of the Statutes of 1991, contains an affirmative finding regarding the feasibility of producing recyclable telephone directories without significantly reducing the durability of the directories nor significantly increasing production costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 171.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

42554.

It is the goal of this state that not less than 30 percent of telephone directories distributed in this state be recycled on and after January 1, 1994, that 35 percent of telephone directories distributed in this state be recycled on and after January 1, 1996, that 40 percent of telephone directories distributed in this state be recycled on and after January 1, 1998, and that 50 percent of telephone directories distributed in this state be recycled on and after January 1, 2000.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1066, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42555.

If the board determines that the policy goals established by Section 42554 are not being met by January 1, 1995, the board shall make recommendations to the Legislature, on or before January 1, 1996, on strategies for meeting the goals established in Section 42554.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1066, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42556.

If the board determines that the policy goals established by Section 42554 are not being met by January 1, 1999, the board shall make recommendations to the Legislature, on or before January 1, 2000, on strategies for meeting the goals established in Section 42554.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1066, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Recyclable Telephone Directories [42557. - 42558.]

42557.

On and after January 1, 1995, all telephone directories distributed within the state shall be made from materials that will allow for the maximum volume of directories to be recycled, as determined by the board. If reasonably feasible, it is the goal of this state that existing waste paper recyclers make an effort to accept telephone directories for recycling.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1066, Sec. 2.   Section (as part of Article 2) conditionally operative as prescribed in Section 42553.)
-------------------------------------------

42558.

For the purposes of implementing and enforcing this chapter, the board shall adopt general guidelines regarding the materials which may be used in the production of telephone directories which can and will be recycled. The guidelines shall be reviewed and promptly updated, as necessary, in order to avoid delay in the introduction of new materials or new recycling processes which will advance efforts to recycle telephone directories.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1066, Sec. 2.   Section (as part of Article 2) conditionally operative as prescribed in Section 42553.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Office Paper Recovery Program [42560. - 42562.]

42560.

“Recycled-content high grade, bleached printing and writing papers” means any of the following papers:

(a) Offset printing, mimeograph, and duplicator paper.

(b) Stationery, bond, and office paper.

(c) High-speed copier paper.

(d) Envelopes without plastic address windows.

(e) Form bond, including computer paper and carbonless forms.

(f) Book papers.

(g) Ledger, cover stock, and cotton fiber papers having a secondary wastepaper, as defined in Section 42204, or postconsumer wastepaper, as defined in Section 42203, content of at least 50 percent by weight.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1096, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42561.

On or before January 1, 1991, the board shall initiate a high grade white office paper recovery assistance program for state and local agencies and private businesses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1096, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42562.

The high grade white office paper recovery assistance program shall include the following elements:

(a) Staff training materials designed to provide training to local program coordinators and instruction to personnel of state and local agencies and private businesses who would participate in high grade white office paper recovery programs.

(b) Public information materials designed to provide initial program startup support and periodic reinforcement to high grade white office paper recovery programs.

(c) Desk top collection containers designed for use by personnel within the office setting.

(d) Metal collection bins that meet State Fire Marshal’s standards for overnight storage of flammable materials for use in intermediate storage of recovered paper.

(e) Staff assistance from the board to identify markets for collected materials, including model contracts for negotiation with local paper brokers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1096, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Public Information and Education [42600. - 42605.]

42600.

The board shall establish a statewide public information and education program to encourage participation by the general public, business, government, and industry in all phases of integrated waste management. To the maximum extent possible, the public information and education program developed pursuant to this chapter shall be coordinated so as to not duplicate the efforts of other state agency public information programs for the promotion of source reduction, recycling, and composting. The public information and education program shall encourage participation in the board’s integrated waste management programs and in local and regional programs. The board’s program shall, at a minimum, include strategies and specific campaign activities to do all of the following:
